pl: Materiał sprzętu zabezpieczającego: Włókno szklane; Skórzane; Metal; Nylon; Tworzywo sztuczne; Poliester; Guma; Inne
de: Sicherheitsausrüstungsmaterial: Fiberglas; Leder; Metall; Nylon; Kunststoff; Polyester; Gummi; Sonstiges
en: Safety equipment material: Fiberglass; Leather; Metal; Nylon; Plastic; Polyester; Rubber; Other
ru: Материал защитной экипировки: Стекловолокно; Кожа; Металл; Нейлон; Пластик; Полиэстер; Резина; Другой
ko: 안전장비 소재: 유리 섬유; 가죽; 금속; 나일론; 플라스틱; 폴리에스테르; 고무; 기타
tr: Güvenlik ekipmanı malzemesi: Fiberglas; Deri; Metal; Plastik; Plastik; Poliyester; Kauçuk; Diğer
nb: Sikkerhetsutstyrsmateriale: Glassfiber; Skinn; Metall; Nylon; Plast; Polyester; Gummi; Annet
pt-BR: Materiais de equipamentos de segurança: Fibra de vidro; Couro; Metal; Nylon; Plástico; Poliéster; Borracha; Outro
lt-LT: Apsaugos įrangos medžiaga: Stiklo pluoštas; Oda; Metalas; Nailonas; Plastikas; Poliesteris; Kaučiukas; Kita
hr-HR: Materijal sigurnosne opreme: Stakloplastika; Koža; Metal; Najlon; Plastika; Poliester; Guma; Ostalo
da: Sikkerhedsudstyrsmateriale: Glasfiber; Læder; Metal; Nylon; Plast; Polyester; Gummi; Andet
fi: Harjoitusvälinemateriaalit: Lasikuitu; Nahka; Metalli; Nailon; Muovi; Polyesteri; Kumi; Muu
zh-TW: 安全設備材質: 玻璃纖維; 皮製; 金屬; 尼龍; 塑膠; 聚酯; 橡膠; 其他
ro-RO: Material echipament de siguranță: Fibră de sticlă; Piele; Metal; Nailon; Plastic; Poliester; Cauciuc; Altele
es: Material del equipo de seguridad: Fibra de vidrio; Cuero; Metal; Nylon; Plástico; Poliéster; Goma; Otros
cs: Materiál bezpečnostního vybavení: Skelná vata; Kůže; Kov; Nylon; Plast; Polyester; Guma; Jiné
el: Υλικό εξοπλισμού ασφαλείας: Υαλοβάμβακας; Δερμάτινο; Μέταλλο; Νάιλον; Πλαστικό; Πολυεστέρας; Καουτσούκ; Άλλο
sl-SI: Material za varnostno opremo: Steklena vlakna; Usnje; Kovina; Najlon; Plastika; Poliester; Guma; Drugo
th: วัสดุที่ใช้ทำอุปกรณ์ความปลอดภัย: ไฟเบอร์กลาส; หนัง; โลหะ; ไนลอน; พลาสติก; โพลีเอสเตอร์; ยาง; อื่นๆ
hu: Biztonsági felszerelés anyaga: Üveggyapot; Bőr; Fém; Nejlon; Műanyag; Poliészter; Gumi; Egyéb
vi: Vật liệu thiết bị an toàn: Sợi thủy tinh; Da; Kim loại; Nylon; Nhựa; Polyester; Cao su; Khác
nl: Materiaal veiligheidsuitrusting: Glasvezel; Leer; Metaal; Nylon; Plastic; Polyester; Rubber; Andere
ja: 安全装置の材質: ガラス繊維; レザー; 金属; ナイロン; プラスチック; ポリエステル; ゴム; その他
it: Materiale dell'attrezzatura di sicurezza: Vetroresina; Pelle; Metallo; Nylon; Plastica; Poliestere; Gomma; Altro
bg-BG: Материал за оборудване за безопасност: Fiberglass; Кожа; Метал; Найлон; Пластмаса; Полиестер; Каучук; Други
sv: Säkerhetsutrustning - material: Glasfiber; Läder; Metall; Nylon; Plast; Polyester; Gummi; Övrigt
fr: Matériau de l’équipement de sécurité: Fibre de verre; Cuir; Métal; Nylon; Plastique; Polyester; Caoutchouc; Autre
pt-PT: Material do equipamento de segurança: Fibra de vidro; Pele; Metal; Náilon; Plástico; Poliéster; Borracha; Outro
sk-SK: Materiál bezpečnostného vybavenia: Sklolaminát; Koža; Kov; Nylon; Plast; Polyester; Guma; Iné
zh-CN: 安全设备材质: 玻璃纤维; 皮革; 金属; 尼龙; 塑料; 聚酯纤维; 橡胶; 其他